trunk/apertium-hbs-slv/apertium-hbs-slv.hbs.metadix
    <pardef n="imperf_tv_drž/ati__vblex">
      <!--Infinitive-->
      <e><p><l></l><r>a</r></p><par n="inf_ti+fiiI__sfx__tv__vblex__imperf"/></e>
      <!--Imperative-->
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="imp__sfx__i__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Present-->
      <e><p><l></l><r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="pres__sfx__im__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Imperfect-->
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="imperf__sfx__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Participles-->
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="lp_o__sfx"/></e>
      <!--<e><p><l>eći</l><r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>--><!--verbose adverbs-->
      <e><p><l>eći</l><r>eći<s n="vblex"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e><!--simple adverbs-->
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="imperf_iv_p/rati__vblex">
      <!--Infinitive-->
      <e><p><l>ra</l><r>ra</r></p><par n="inf_ti+fiiI__sfx__iv__vblex__imperf"/></e>
      <!--Imperative-->
      <e><p><l>er</l><r>rati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="imp__sfx__i__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Present-->
      <e><p><l>er</l><r>rati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="pres__sfx__em__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Imperfect-->
      <e><p><l>ra</l><r>rati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="imperf__sfx__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Aorist-->
      <e><p><l>ra</l><r>rati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="aor__sfx__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Participles-->
      <e><p><l>ra</l><r>rati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="lp_o__sfx"/></e>
      <!--<e><p><l>erući</l><r>rati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>--><!--verbose adverbs-->
      <e><p><l>erući</l><r>erući<s n="vblex"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e><!--simple adverbs-->
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="imperf_ref_p/rati__vblex">
      <!--Infinitive-->
      <e><p><l>ra</l><r>ra</r></p><par n="inf_ti+fiiI__sfx__ref__vblex__imperf"/></e>
      <!--Imperative-->
      <e><p><l>er</l><r>rati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="ref"/></r></p><par n="imp__sfx__i__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Present-->
      <e><p><l>er</l><r>rati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="ref"/></r></p><par n="pres__sfx__em__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Imperfect-->
      <e><p><l>ra</l><r>rati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="ref"/></r></p><par n="imperf__sfx__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Aorist-->
      <e><p><l>ra</l><r>rati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="ref"/></r></p><par n="aor__sfx__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Participles-->
      <e><p><l>ra</l><r>rati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="ref"/></r></p><par n="lp_o__sfx"/></e>
      <!--<e><p><l>erući</l><r>rati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="ref"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>--><!--verbose adverbs-->
      <e><p><l>erući</l><r>erući<s n="vblex"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e><!--simple adverbs-->
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="imperf_tv_p/rati__vblex">
      <!--Infinitive-->
      <e><p><l>ra</l><r>ra</r></p><par n="inf_ti+fiiI__sfx__tv__vblex__imperf"/></e>
      <!--Imperative-->
      <e><p><l>er</l><r>rati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="imp__sfx__i__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Present-->
      <e><p><l>er</l><r>rati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="pres__sfx__em__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Imperfect-->
      <e><p><l>ra</l><r>rati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="imperf__sfx__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Aorist-->
      <e><p><l>ra</l><r>rati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="aor__sfx__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Participles-->
      <e><p><l>ra</l><r>rati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="lp_o__sfx"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ran</l><r>rati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="pp_sfx_extra__vblex"/></e>
      <!--<e><p><l>erući</l><r>rati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>--><!--verbose adverbs-->
      <e><p><l>erući</l><r>erući<s n="vblex"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e><!--simple adverbs-->
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="perf_tv_op/rati__vblex">
      <!--Infinitive-->
      <e><p><l>ra</l><r>ra</r></p><par n="inf_ti+fiiI__sfx__tv__vblex__perf"/></e>
      <!--Imperative-->
      <e><p><l>er</l><r>rati<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="imp__sfx__i__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Present-->
      <e><p><l>er</l><r>rati<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="pres__sfx__em__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Aorist-->
      <e><p><l>ra</l><r>rati<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="aor__sfx__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Participles-->
      <e><p><l>ra</l><r>rati<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="lp_o__sfx"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ran</l><r>rati<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="pp_sfx_extra__vblex"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ravši</l><r>rati<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e><!--verbose adverbs-->
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="perf_ref_op/rati__vblex">
      <!--Infinitive-->
      <e><p><l>ra</l><r>ra</r></p><par n="inf_ti+fiiI__sfx__ref__vblex__perf"/></e>
      <!--Imperative-->
      <e><p><l>er</l><r>rati<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="ref"/></r></p><par n="imp__sfx__i__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Present-->
      <e><p><l>er</l><r>rati<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="ref"/></r></p><par n="pres__sfx__em__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Aorist-->
      <e><p><l>ra</l><r>rati<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="ref"/></r></p><par n="aor__sfx__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Participles-->
      <e><p><l>ra</l><r>rati<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="ref"/></r></p><par n="lp_o__sfx"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ravši</l><r>rati<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="ref"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e><!--verbose adverbs-->
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="perf_iv_op/rati__vblex">
      <!--Infinitive-->
      <e><p><l>ra</l><r>ra</r></p><par n="inf_ti+fiiI__sfx__iv__vblex__perf"/></e>
      <!--Imperative-->
      <e><p><l>er</l><r>rati<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="imp__sfx__i__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Present-->
      <e><p><l>er</l><r>rati<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="pres__sfx__em__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Aorist-->
      <e><p><l>ra</l><r>rati<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="aor__sfx__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Participles-->
      <e><p><l>ra</l><r>rati<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="lp_o__sfx"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ravši</l><r>rati<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e><!--verbose adverbs-->
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="imperf_iv_bir/ati__vblex">
      <!--Infinitive-->
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>a</r></p><par n="inf_ti+fiiI__sfx__iv__vblex__imperf"/></e>
      <!--Imperative-->
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="imp__sfx__j__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Present-->
      <e><p><l></l><r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="pres__sfx__am__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Imperfect-->
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="imperf__sfx__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Participles-->
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="lp_o__sfx"/></e>
      <!--<e><p><l>ajući</l><r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>--><!--verbose adverbs-->
      <e><p><l>ajući</l><r>ajući<s n="vblex"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e><!--simple adverbs-->
    </pardef>

 <e lm="lutati"><i>lut</i><par n="imperf_iv_bir/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="svirati"><i>svir</i><par n="imperf_iv_bir/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="izabrati"><i>izab</i><par n="perf_tv_op/rati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="odmarati"><i>odmar</i><par n="imperf_iv_bir/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="odvraćati"><i>odvrać</i><par n="imperf_iv_bir/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pjevati"><i>p</i><par n="e_je__yat"/><i>v</i><par n="imperf_iv_bir/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="postupati"><i>postup</i><par n="imperf_iv_bir/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="praštati"><i>prašt</i><par n="imperf_iv_bir/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="predsjedati"><i>preds</i><par n="e_je__yat"/><i>d</i><par n="imperf_iv_bir/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="prekidati"><i>prekid</i><par n="imperf_iv_bir/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="saosjećati"><i>saos</i><par n="e_je__yat"/><i>ć</i><par n="imperf_iv_bir/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="stupati"><i>stup</i><par n="imperf_iv_bir/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="suosjećati"><i>suos</i><par n="e_je__yat"/><i>ć</i><par n="imperf_iv_bir/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="uspijevati"><i>usp</i><par n="e_ije__yat"/><i>v</i><par n="imperf_iv_bir/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="izgledati"><i>izgled</i><par n="imperf_iv_bir/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="gledati"><i>gled</i><par n="imperf_iv_bir/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dobivati"><i>dobiv</i><par n="imperf_iv_bir/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="manevrirati"><i>manevrir</i><par n="imperf_iv_bir/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="masirati"><i>masir</i><par n="imperf_iv_bir/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="obolijevati"><i>obol</i><par n="e_ije__yat"/><i>v</i><par n="imperf_iv_bir/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dozvoljavati"><i>dozvoljav</i><par n="imperf_iv_bir/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="završavati"><i>završav</i><par n="imperf_iv_bir/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ležati"><i>lež</i><par n="imperf_iv_bir/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pripadati"><i>pripad</i><par n="imperf_iv_bir/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="čitati"><i>čit</i><par n="imperf_iv_bir/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="duvati"><i>duv</i><par n="imperf_iv_bir/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="duhati"><i>duh</i><par n="imperf_iv_bir/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pljuvati"><i>pljuv</i><par n="imperf_iv_bir/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="slušati"><i>sluš</i><par n="imperf_iv_bir/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vladati"><i>vlad</i><par n="imperf_iv_bir/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sabrati"><i>sab</i><par n="perf_tv_op/rati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sabrati"><i>sab</i><par n="perf_ref_op/rati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="prati"><i>p</i><par n="imperf_tv_p/rati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="prati"><i>p</i><par n="imperf_ref_p/rati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="držati"><i>drž</i><par n="imperf_tv_drž/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="razmišljati"><i>razmišlj</i><par n="imperf_iv_bir/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="smetati"><i>smet</i><par n="imperf_iv_bir/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="plaćati"><i>plać</i><par n="imperf_iv_bir/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="izvještavati"><i>izvještav</i><par n="imperf_iv_bir/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="približavati"><i>približav</i><par n="imperf_iv_bir/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="crkavati"><i>crkav</i><par n="imperf_iv_bir/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="iseljavati"><i>iseljav</i><par n="imperf_iv_bir/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="zaživljavati"><i>zaživljav</i><par n="imperf_iv_bir/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="odležavati"><i>odležav</i><par n="imperf_iv_bir/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="podučavati"><i>podučav</i><par n="imperf_iv_bir/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="uvećavati"><i>uvećav</i><par n="imperf_iv_bir/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="iščezavati"><i>iščezav</i><par n="imperf_iv_bir/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pribjegavati"><i>pribjegav</i><par n="imperf_iv_bir/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="počivati"><i>počiv</i><par n="imperf_iv_bir/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="šivati"><i>šiv</i><par n="imperf_iv_bir/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dirati"><i>dir</i><par n="imperf_iv_bir/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="funkcionirati"><i>funkcionir</i><par n="imperf_iv_bir/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="inzistirati"><i>inzistir</i><par n="imperf_iv_bir/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="obamirati"><i>obamir</i><par n="imperf_iv_bir/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dominirati"><i>dominir</i><par n="imperf_iv_bir/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="lobirati"><i>lobir</i><par n="imperf_iv_bir/ati__vblex"/></e>
 <e lm="črčkati"><i>črčk</i><par n="imperf_iv_bir/ati__vblex"/></e>
